Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB706.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 6109(h)(1) of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended and the subsection is amended by adding a paragraph to read:§ 6109. Licenses.* * *(h) Fee.--(1) [In] Except as provided for in paragraph (8), in addition to fees described in [paragraphs (2)(ii) and] paragraph (3), the fee for a license to carry a firearm is $19. This includes all of the following:(i) A renewal notice processing fee of $1.50.(ii) An administrative fee of $5 under section 14(2) of the act of July 6, 1984 (P.L.614, No.127), known as 123456789101112131415161718 the Sheriff Fee Act.* * *(8) The governing authority of a county may, after consultation with the sheriff or, in a city of the first class, the chief of police, waive the fees provided for in paragraphs (1) and (3) for an applicant who is an honorably discharged veteran of the armed forces of the United States or is 65 years of age or older.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0706PN0725 - 2 - 12345678910